Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,250
Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Permit and Approval Cash Fund; created; investment.

The Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Permit and Approval Cash Fund is created. Fees collected pursuant to section 81-15,248.01 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be administered by the department. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Any money remaining in the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Cash Fund on March 8, 2007, shall be transferred to the Private Onsite Wastewater Treatment System Certification and Registration Cash Fund created under section 81-15,250.01 on such date.

Laws 2003, LB 94, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB333, § 6.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.